fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-DerXXX_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - TI -  adsf : # Verbal TI derivations

     # TI -> II: Pass with -makan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Pass+V+II+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcikâtêw
     PV/ê+wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Pass+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wâpahcikâtêk
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Pass+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mîcîkâtêw
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Pass+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ê-mîcîkâtêk
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Pass+V+II+Ind+3Sg: kîsihcâkâtêw
     PV/ê+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Pass+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ê-kîsihcâkâtêk

     # TI -> TI: Dim with -si
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcasiw
     PV/ê+wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wâpahcasit
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: mîcisiw
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-mîcisit
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: kîsihcâsiw
     PV/ê+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-kîsihcâsit

     # TI -> AI: Hab with -ski
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Hab+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: wâpahtaskiw
     PV/ê+wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Hab+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wâpahtaskit
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Hab+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: mîciskiw
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Hab+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-mîciskit
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Hab+V+TI+Ind+3Sg: kîsihtâskiw
     PV/ê+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Hab+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-kîsihtâskit

     # TI -> AI: Antip with -ikê
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcikêw
     PV/ê+wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wâpahcikêt
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: mîcîkêw
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-mîcîkêt
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: kîsihcâkêw
     PV/ê+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-kîsihcâkêt
     
     # TI -> TA: Bnf with -amaw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahtamawêw
     PV/ê+wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-wâpahtamawât
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: mîcîmawêw
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-mîcîmawât
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîsihtâmawêw
     PV/ê+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-kîsihtâmawât
     
     # TI -> TA: Caus with -ih / -amih / -amoh
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ wâpahtihêw, wâpahtamihêw, wâpahtamohêw ]
     PV/ê+wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ ê-wâpahtihât, ê-wâpahtamihât, ê-wâpahtamohât ]
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ mîcîhêw, mîcîmihêw, mîcîmohêw ]
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ ê-mîcîhât, ê-mîcîmihât, ê-mîcîmohât ]
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ kîsihtâhêw, kîsihtâmihêw, kîsihtâmohêw ]
     PV/ê+kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ ê-kîsihtâhât, ê-kîsihtâmihât, ê-kîsihtâmohât ]
     
     ## Nominalization

     # AI -> NI: Nom with -(amo)win
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: wâpahtamowin
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâpahtamowina
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: mîciwin
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nimîciwina
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: kîsihtâwin
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nikîsihtâwina

     ## Instruments
     
     # AI -> NI: Ins with -ikan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Ins+N+I+Sg: wâpahcikan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Ins+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâpahcikana
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Ins+N+I+Sg: mîcîkan
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Ins+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nimîcîkana
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Ins+N+I+Sg: kîsihcâkan
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Ins+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nikîsihcâkana

     # AI -> NI: Ins2 with -âkan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Sg: wâpahtâkan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâpahtâkana
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Sg: mîcâkan
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nimîcâkana
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Sg: kîsihtâkan
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Ins2+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nikîsihtâkana

     # AI -> NI: Ins3 with  -ikâkan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Ins3+N+I+Sg: wâpahcikâkan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Ins3+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâpahcikâkana
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Ins3+N+I+Sg: mîcîkâkan
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Ins3+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nimîcîkâkana
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Ins3+N+I+Sg: kîsihcâkâkan
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Ins3+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nikîsihcâkâkana


     ## Agentive forms
     # Agentive o- ... -(amo)w
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Age+N+A+Sg: owâpahtamow
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Age+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitôwâpahtamowak
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Age+N+A+Sg: omîciw
     mîciw+V+TI+Der/Age+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitômîciwak
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Age+N+A+Sg: okîsihtâw
     kîsihtâw+V+TI+Der/Age+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitôkîsihtâwak


     # Complex forms
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: wâpahcikêwin
     PV/wîci+wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîci-wâpahtamômêw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Pass+V+II+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcikêmakan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcikêhêw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Der/Goa+N+A+Sg: wâpahcikêhâkan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcikêstawêw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Goa+N+A+Sg: wâpahcikêstawâkan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcikêstâsow
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: wâpahcikêstâsowin
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wâpahcikêstâtowak
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Pl: wâpahcikêstâtowina

     # Diminutives
     PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ wîci-acoskêmêsiw, wîcacoskêmêsiw ]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: wâpahcasîkêwin
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: wâpahcikêsiwin
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcasîkêhêsiw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcikêsihêsiw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcikêhêsiw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcikêstawêw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcasîkêscawêsiw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcikêsiscawêsiw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpahcikêscawêsiw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcikêstâsow
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Dim+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcasîkêstâsow
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcikêsistâsow
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wâpahcikêscâsosiw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [ wâpahcikêscâsowinis, wâpahcikêscâsowinisis ]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl: [ wâpahcikêscâcowinisa, wâpahcikêscâcowinisisa ]
